Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.592

Personal information—Covered entities.

A covered entity under the federal health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996, Title 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1320d et seq., is deemed to have complied with the requirements of this chapter with respect to protected health information if it has complied with section 13402 of the federal health information technology for economic and clinical health act, P.L. 111-5 as it existed on July 24, 2015. Covered entities shall notify the attorney general pursuant to RCW 42.56.590(7) in compliance with the timeliness of notification requirements of section 13402 of the federal health information technology for economic and clinical health act, P.L. 111-5 as it existed on July 24, 2015, notwithstanding the timeline in RCW 42.56.590(7).

[ 2019 c 241 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 241: See note following RCW 19.255.010.